Massachusetts, session 194th, H1359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 26 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “members”, the following words:- ; and the following acute 
condition (i) anaphylaxis. 
SECTION 2. Subsection (c) of said section 26 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “diabetes”, the following words:- and epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector as the drug used to treat anaphylaxis.  
SECTION 3. Said subsection (c) of said section 26 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following words:- or acute 
condition. 
SECTION 4. Said clause (v) of said subsection (c) of said section 26 of said chapter 342, 
as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following 
words:- or acute condition. 

of 6 13  SECTION 5. Subsection (d) of said section 26 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Coverage for 1 brand name of epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector or 1 generic brand of epinephrine delivered via an autoinjector shall 
not be subject to any deductible or co-insurance and any co-payment shall not exceed $60 for a 
two-pack of epinephrine autoinjectors. 
SECTION 6. Subsection (b) of section 28 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “enrollees”, the following words:- ; and the following acute 
condition (i) anaphylaxis. 
SECTION 7. Subsection (c) of said section 28 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “diabetes”, the following words:- and epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector as the drug used to treat anaphylaxis.  
SECTION 8. Said subsection (c) of said section 28 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following words:- or acute 
condition. 
SECTION 9. Said clause (v) of said subsection (c) of said section 28 of said chapter 342, 
as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following 
words:- or acute condition. 
SECTION 10. Subsection (d) of said section 28 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Coverage for 1 brand name of epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector or 1 generic brand of epinephrine delivered via an autoinjector shall 
not be subject to any deductible or co-insurance and any co-payment shall not exceed $60 for a 
two-pack of epinephrine autoinjectors. 

of 6 35  SECTION 11. Subsection (b) of section 31 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “enrollees”, the following words:- ; and the following acute 
condition (i) anaphylaxis. 
SECTION 12. Subsection (c) of said section 31 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “diabetes”, the following words:- and epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector as the drug used to treat anaphylaxis.  
SECTION 13. Said subsection (c) of said section 31 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following words:- or acute 
condition. 
SECTION 14. Said clause (v) of said subsection (c) of said section 31 of said chapter 
342, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the 
following words:- or acute condition. 
SECTION 15. Subsection (d) of said section 31 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Coverage for 1 brand name of epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector or 1 generic brand of epinephrine delivered via an autoinjector shall 
not be subject to any deductible or co-insurance and any co-payment shall not exceed $60 for a 
two-pack of epinephrine autoinjectors. 
SECTION 16. Subsection (b) of section 33 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “enrollees”, the following words:- ; and the following acute 
condition (i) anaphylaxis. 

of 6 55  SECTION 17. Subsection (c) of said section 33 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “diabetes”, the following words:- and epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector as the drug used to treat anaphylaxis.  
SECTION 18. Said subsection (c) of said section 33 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following words:- or acute 
condition. 
SECTION 19. Said clause (v) of said subsection (c) of said section 33 of said chapter 
342, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the 
following words:- or acute condition. 
SECTION 20. Subsection (d) of said section 33 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Coverage for 1 brand name of epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector or 1 generic brand of epinephrine delivered via an autoinjector shall 
not be subject to any deductible or co-insurance and any co-payment shall not exceed $60 for a 
two-pack of epinephrine autoinjectors. 
SECTION 21. Subsection (b) of section 34 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “enrollees”, the following words:- ; and the following acute 
condition (i) anaphylaxis. 
SECTION 22. Subsection (c) of said section 34 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “diabetes”, the following words:- and epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector as the drug used to treat anaphylaxis.  

of 6 75  SECTION 23. Said subsection (c) of said section 34 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following words:- or acute 
condition. 
SECTION 24. Said clause (v) of said subsection (c) of said section 34 of said chapter 
342, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the 
following words:- or acute condition. 
SECTION 25. Subsection (d) of said section 34 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Coverage for 1 brand name of epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector or 1 generic brand of epinephrine delivered via an autoinjector shall 
not be subject to any deductible or co-insurance and any co-payment shall not exceed $60 for a 
two-pack of epinephrine autoinjectors. 
SECTION 26. Subsection (b) of section 35 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the word “enrollees”, the following words:- ; and the following acute 
condition (i) anaphylaxis. 
SECTION 27. Subsection (c) of said section 35 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the word “diabetes”, the following words:- and epinephrine 
delivered via an autoinjector as the drug used to treat anaphylaxis.  
SECTION 28.  Said subsection (c) of said section 35 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the following words:- or acute 
condition. 

of 6 95  SECTION 29. Said clause (v) of said subsection (c) of said section 35 of said chapter 
342, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “condition”, the 
following words:- or acute condition. 
SECTION 30. Subsection (d) of said section 35 of said chapter 342, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Coverage for 1 brand name of epinephrine 
100 delivered via an autoinjector or 1 generic brand of epinephrine delivered via an autoinjector shall 
101 not be subject to any deductible or co-insurance and any co-payment shall not exceed $60 for a 
102 two-pack of epinephrine autoinjectors. 
103  SECTION 31. This act shall apply to all contracts entered into, renewed or amended on 
104 or after July 1, 2026.